Illinois, session 104th, HB3857.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 10-4 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/10-4)  (from Ch. 46, par. 10-4)7    Sec. 10-4. Form of petition for nomination. All petitions 8for nomination under this Article 10 for candidates for public 9office in this State, shall in addition to other requirements 10provided by law, be as follows: Such petitions shall consist 11of sheets of uniform size and each sheet shall contain, above 12the space for signature, an appropriate heading, giving only 13the information as to name of candidate or candidates in whose 14behalf such petition is signed; the office; the party; place 15of residence; and such other information or wording as 16required to make same valid, and the heading of each sheet 17shall be the same. No image, symbol, or slogan shall appear in 18the heading of a petition for nomination other than the 19information required under this Section. Any emblem or label 20indicating that the petition for nomination was printed by a 21union printer shall not be considered an image, symbol, or 22slogan. Such petition shall be signed by the qualified voters 23in their own proper persons only, and opposite the signature   HB3857- 2 -LRB104 11010 SPS 21092 b1of each signer his residence address shall be written or 2printed. The residence address required to be written or 3printed opposite each qualified primary elector's name shall 4include the street address or rural route number of the 5signer, as the case may be, as well as the signer's county, and 6city, village or town, and state. However, the county or city, 7village or town, and state of residence of such electors may be 8printed on the petition forms where all of the electors 9signing the petition reside in the same county or city, 10village or town, and state. Standard abbreviations may be used 11in writing the residence address, including street number, if 12any. Except as otherwise provided in this Code, no signature 13shall be valid or be counted in considering the validity or 14sufficiency of such petition unless the requirements of this 15Section are complied with. At the bottom of each sheet of such 16petition shall be added a circulator's statement, signed by a 17person 18 years of age or older who is a citizen of the United 18States; stating the street address or rural route number, as 19the case may be, as well as the county, city, village or town, 20and state; certifying that the signatures on that sheet of the 21petition were signed in his or her presence; certifying that 22the signatures are genuine; and either (1) indicating the 23dates on which that sheet was circulated, or (2) indicating 24the first and last dates on which the sheet was circulated, or 25(3) certifying that none of the signatures on the sheet were 26signed more than 90 days preceding the last day for the filing   HB3857- 3 -LRB104 11010 SPS 21092 b1of the petition; and certifying that to the best of his 2knowledge and belief the persons so signing were at the time of 3signing the petition duly registered voters under Article 4, 45, or 6 of this Code of the political subdivision or district 5for which the candidate or candidates shall be nominated, and 6certifying that their respective residences are correctly 7stated therein. Such statement shall be sworn to before some 8officer authorized to administer oaths in this State. Except 9as otherwise provided in this Code, no petition sheet shall be 10circulated more than 90 days preceding the last day provided 11in Section 10-6 for the filing of such petition. Such sheets, 12before being presented to the electoral board or filed with 13the proper officer of the electoral district or division of 14the state or municipality, as the case may be, shall be neatly 15fastened together in book form, by placing the sheets in a pile 16and fastening them together at one edge in a secure and 17suitable manner, and the sheets shall then be numbered 18consecutively. The sheets shall not be fastened by pasting 19them together end to end, so as to form a continuous strip or 20roll. All petition sheets which are filed with the proper 21local election officials, election authorities or the State 22Board of Elections shall be the original sheets which have 23been signed by the voters and by the circulator, and not 24photocopies or duplicates of such sheets. A petition, when 25presented or filed, shall not be withdrawn, altered, or added 26to, and no signature shall be revoked except by revocation in   HB3857- 4 -LRB104 11010 SPS 21092 b1writing presented or filed with the officers or officer with 2whom the petition is required to be presented or filed, and 3before the presentment or filing of such petition. Whoever 4forges any name of a signer upon any petition shall be deemed 5guilty of a forgery, and on conviction thereof, shall be 6punished accordingly. The word "petition" or "petition for 7nomination", as used herein, shall mean what is sometimes 8known as nomination papers, in distinction to what is known as 9a certificate of nomination. The words "political division for 10which the candidate is nominated", or its equivalent, shall 11mean the largest political division in which all qualified 12voters may vote upon such candidate or candidates, as the 13state in the case of state officers; the township in the case 14of township officers et cetera. Provided, further, that no 15person shall circulate or certify petitions for candidates of 16more than one political party, or for an independent candidate 17or candidates in addition to one political party, to be voted 18upon at the next primary or general election, or for such 19candidates and parties with respect to the same political 20subdivision at the next consolidated election.21(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-687, eff. 12-17-21.)